Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.782

[Art. 128] Assault upon another member of the organized militia.

Any person subject to this code who attempts or offers with unlawful force or violence to do bodily harm to another member of the organized militia, whether or not the attempt or offer is consummated, is guilty of assault and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 2009 c 378 s 26.]